New Jersey, session 222, A105.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. The New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall establish and maintain a program to provide a discounted toll rate to all persons 65 years of age and older who have an account with the New Jersey electronic toll collection system for passenger vehicles.  The discount shall be available at all hours and shall be for an amount at least 10 percent less than the amount of the toll rate for persons with a New Jersey electronic toll collection system account for a passenger vehicle.  The authority shall automatically apply the discount when: an account holder who has an electronic toll collection system account for a passenger vehicle turns 65 years of age; and when a person who is 65 years of age or older applies for an electronic toll collection system account for a passenger vehicle. 2.  The South Jersey Transportation Authority shall establish and maintain a program to provide a discounted toll rate to all persons 65 years of age and older who have an account with the New Jersey electronic toll collection system for passenger vehicles.  The discount shall be available at all hours and shall be for an amount at least 10 percent less than the amount of the toll rate for persons with a New Jersey electronic toll collection system account for a passenger vehicle.  The authority shall automatically apply the discount when: an account holder who has an electronic toll collection system account for a passenger vehicle turns 65 years of age; and when a person who is 65 years or age or older applies for an electronic toll collection system account for a passenger vehicle. 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month after enactment.